West Virginia, session 2026, HB4595.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 12. workforce pell grants. §5B-12-1. Definitions. For the purposes of this article:(1) "Eligible workforce training programs" are programs that meet applicable requirements in section 83002 of Public Law No. 119-21.(2) "High-skill industry sectors or occupations" are sectors or occupations requiring postsecondary education, experience, or training beyond a high school diploma. (3) "High-wage industry sectors or occupations" are sectors or occupations with earnings above 150% of the Federal Poverty Level for individual earners. (4) "In-demand industry sectors or occupations" are sectors or occupations identified in state, regional, or local workforce development or labor market projections as growing, emerging, or having projected shortages or hiring demand. §5B-12-2. Duty and authority of the Governor to approve programs. The governor shall, in consultation with the West Virginia Workforce Development Board, approve eligible workforce training programs for eligibility for federal Workforce Pell Grants if they satisfy at least one of the following criteria:(1) The program prepares students for a high-skill industry sector or occupation;(2) The program prepares students for a high-wage industry sector or occupation; or(3) The program prepares students for an in-demand industry sector or occupation. §5B-12-3. Rulemaking. The West Virginia Workforce Development Board shall propose rules for Legislative approval pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code. §5B-12-4. Compliance with federal rules. All provisions under this Act shall be consistent with applicable federal rules governing the Workforce Pell Grant program. If any provision of this Act is found to conflict with federal law or regulation, the federal requirement shall govern. §5B-12-5. Effective date. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.